Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.180

Conduct of elections.

The election of the board of freeholders and that upon the proposition of adopting the proposed new, altered or revised charter, may be general or special elections and except as herein provided, said elections, the returns, the canvassing thereof and the declaration of the result shall be governed by the laws regulating and controlling elections in the city. In both cases the notice specifying the object of the election must be given at least ten days before the day of election.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.180. Prior: (i) 1895 c 27 s 4; RRS s 8958. (ii) 1895 c 27 s 5; RRS s 8959.]

NOTES:

Election on amendment to charter: State Constitution Art. 11 s 10 (Amendment 40).